Missouri, session 2026, SB910.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 565.184, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 565.184,
to read as follows:
565.184. 1. A person commits the offense of abuse of
an elderly person, a person with a disability, or a
vulnerable person if he or she:
(1) Purposely engages in [conduct involving] more than
one incident in which purposeful and unreasonable conduct
[that] causes emotional distress to an elderly person, a
person with a disability, or a vulnerable person. The
course of conduct shall be such as a reasonable person would
know that such conduct would cause a reasonable elderly
person, person with a disability, or vulnerable person to
suffer substantial emotional distress; or
(2) Intentionally fails to provide reasonable care,
goods, or services to an elderly person, a person with a
disability, or a vulnerable person. The result of the
conduct shall be such as would cause a reasonable elderly
person, person with a disability, or vulnerable person to
suffer actual physical or emotional distress; or
(3) Knowingly acts or knowingly fails to act in a
manner which results in a [substantial] grave risk to the
life, body, or health of an elderly person, a person with a
disability, or a vulnerable person. For the purposes of
1

this section, "grave risk" shall mean immediate, serious, or
life-threatening situations where an individual faces a high
likelihood of death, severe bodily injury, or profound,
lasting impairment to their physical or mental health.
2. The offense of abuse of an elderly person, a person
with a disability, or a vulnerable person is a class [A
misdemeanor] E felony. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to mean that an elderly person, a person with a
disability, or a vulnerable person is abused solely because
such person chooses to rely on spiritual means through
prayer, in lieu of medical care, for his or her health care,
as evidence by such person's explicit consent, advance
directive for health care, or practice.
2